Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 2. Organizational Requirements

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

10 Am. Jur. 2d Banks § 189.

12 C.J.S. Building and Loan Associations §§ 12 to 25, 76 to 82.

§ 13-6-201.
Insurance.

The state banking commissioner shall require as a condition of approval that associations be approved and their savings insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, § 1; 2015 ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “shall require” for “may require.”

§ 13-6-202.
Capitalization.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, associations shall have permanent nonwithdrawable capital stock of one hundred dollars ($100.00) per share and this stock shall be subscribed for as fully paid stock. An association other than a mutual savings and loan association shall not organize with a capital stock less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00). In a mutual savings and loan association without capital stock, the association shall not organize with less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00) in initial capital.

If an association has par value capital stock outstanding of less than one percent (1%) of its savings and investment accounts outstanding, it shall either increase its capital stock to at least one percent (1%) of such outstanding savings accounts or discontinue the acceptance of savings and investment accounts until this amount of capital is provided. This subsection shall not apply to a mutual savings and loan association.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 172, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 13-279.1; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1988, ch. 59, § 1; 2015 ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (a), added the exception at the beginning, inserted “other than a mutual savings and loan association” in the second sentence, and added the last sentence; and added the last sentence in (b).

§ 13-6-203.
Stock.

The capital stock shall all be of one (1) class and shall be fully paid and nonassessable in all events.

The owners of the stock shall be members of the association and entitled to one (1) vote for each share for election of directors and all other purposes.

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 115, § 3.

No preferred stock shall be issued, nor shall any shares be issued which are exempt from bearing their pro rata portion of loss.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 103, § 7; R.S. 1931, § 17-107; C.S. 1945, § 36-108; W.S. 1957, § 13-221; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, § 3.

Term “share”

does not necessarily mean a share evidenced by certificate of stock in usual form, but may mean “a part or definite portion of a thing.” Radalj v. Union Sav. & Loan Ass'n, 59 Wyo. 140, 138 P.2d 984,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 59 Wyo. 186, 141 P.2d 856 (Wyo. 1943).

Determination of membership. —

Fact savings certificates issued by savings and loan association are not in usual form of certificates of shares of stock is not determinative of whether holder was member of association, as certificates are not essential to membership. Radalj v. Union Sav. & Loan Ass'n, 59 Wyo. 140, 138 P.2d 984,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 59 Wyo. 186, 141 P.2d 856 (Wyo. 1943).

Evidence of membership. —

Certificates of stock in building and loan associations are but evidence of membership. Radalj v. Union Sav. & Loan Ass'n, 59 Wyo. 140, 138 P.2d 984,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 59 Wyo. 186, 141 P.2d 856 (Wyo. 1943).

Maturity of stock. —

Bylaws and prospectus of building association which stated that shares are estimated to mature in six years, that when amount of loan fund to credit of any share from monthly payments and profits is equal to its par value it shall be fully paid and matured, and that loans and calculations are made on estimate of specified period required to mature the shares, did not stipulate that the shares shall mature in six years and the controlling provision as to maturity was that stock will mature when amount to its credit shall equal its par value. Clause v. Columbia Sav. & Loan Ass'n, 16 Wyo. 450, 95 P. 54,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1908).

§ 13-6-204.
Reserves.

State savings and loan associations, in addition to the par value of their capital, shall set up and maintain reserves as follows:

Except as provided in W.S.

13-7-102

, before the declaration of a dividend for any period an association shall transfer an amount equal to at least five percent (5%) of its net earnings to a separate reserve account which shall be set up and maintained for the sole purpose of absorbing losses until the general reserve is equal to at least twelve percent (12%) of the savings liability. In the event that any credit to the general reserve is made in excess of the minimum five percent (5%) requirement, the dollar amount of the excess may be carried over as a credit toward the minimum requirement of any subsequent period. If the general reserve is not equal to at least twelve percent (12%) of its savings liability, credits, as above provided, shall again be made to the general reserve until it equals at least twelve percent (12%) of its savings liability. The board of directors may make additional transfers to other reserve accounts.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 103, § 7; R.S. 1931, § 17-107; C.S. 1945, § 36-108; W.S. 1957, § 13-221; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1988, ch. 59, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no paragraph (a)(ii) or subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 13-6-205.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 64, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1927, ch. 103, § 5, related to directors of savings and loan associations.

§ 13-6-206.
Bond of officers and agents.

Each officer or agent having the custody of money or securities of any association shall give a bond to the association in an amount to be determined by the board of directors of the association commensurate with his liability. The bond shall be approved by the state banking commissioner.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 103, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 17-105; C.S. 1945, § 36-106; W.S. 1957, § 13-219; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.